Maine, session 132, LD2020.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §254, sub-§17, as amended by PL 2021, c. 12, §1, is further
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The commissioner, in consultation with an organization representing school principals,
shall report no later than January 31, 2022 and annually every 5 years thereafter to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education and cultural
affairs on any available data on the incidence of concussions sustained by student athletes
in the State using existing or new data collection systems. The report must include
recommendations on best practices for the collection of such data.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §5051-A, sub-§3, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 533, §3, is
amended to read:
B. The commissioner shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature
before January 15th March 1st. The report must aggregate the information provided
by superintendents under paragraph A and must evaluate the effect of state laws on the
incidence of truancy.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §7006, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. W, §11, is
amended to read:
5. Annual report. The department shall report annually by March 1st to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters. The
report must include, for school administrative units, each of the components required of the
Child Development Services System pursuant to section 7209, subsection 4, paragraph E
E-1. The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education
matters may report out a bill related to the report to the session of the Legislature in which
the report is received.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §7209, sub-§4, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. W,
§14, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §7209, sub-§4, ¶E-1 is enacted to read:
E-1. To report annually by March 30th to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over education and cultural affairs, the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services
matters and the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
appropriations and financial affairs on the performance of the Child Development
Services System. This report must be posted on the publicly accessible website of the
department. The report must include the following information for the Child
Development Services System in total and separately for the services provided to
eligible children from birth to under 3 years of age and at least 3 years of age and under
6 years of age when the information can be separated for these age categories:
(1) Actual expenditures compared to the budget for each of the last 3 fiscal years
by expense type and function, including salaries, benefits, contracted services,
transportation, direct services and administration;
(2) Actual revenues received compared to the budget for each of the last 3 fiscal
years by revenue source;
Page 1 - 132LR2620(01)

(3) The total dollar value of MaineCare claims paid through the Department of
Health and Human Services for each of the last 3 fiscal years for services provided
pursuant to an individualized education program or individualized family service
plan that were billed directly to the MaineCare program by contracted service
providers;
(4) The number of children referred to the Child Development Services System
under Part C in the prior year by referral source, including the screening programs
in Title 22, sections 1532, 8824 and 8943, and the percentage of children referred
found eligible for services;
(5) The number of children who transitioned in the prior year from early
intervention services for children from birth to under 3 years of age to special
education and related services for children at least 3 years of age and under 6 years
of age;
(6) The percentage of children who received direct services in the prior year who
had MaineCare coverage for all or some of the services specified in their
individualized education programs or individualized family service plans and the
percentage of children who received direct services in the prior year who had
private insurance coverage for all or some of the services specified in their
individualized education programs or individualized family service plans;
(7) A list of Child Development Services System regional sites and their locations;
(8) The total number of Child Development Services System employees by
function;
(9) The number of private providers that contracted with the Child Development
Services System to provide direct services, including transportation services, and
the number of contracted providers delivering each type of service in the prior
fiscal year;
(10) The number of children who received direct services provided by Child
Development Services System employees in the prior fiscal year and the number
of children who received direct services provided by contracted private providers
in the prior fiscal year; and
(11) A description of current and emerging trends and challenges that are
influencing or are expected to have an effect on costs, services or service delivery
methods of the Child Development Services System;
Sec. 6. 20-A MRSA §7209-A, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. W, §17,
is amended to read:
6. Annual report. Beginning March 1, 2025 and in each subsequent year of the
transition phase in subsections 1 to 3, the department shall submit a report to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters. The
report must include data and information regarding the number of school administrative
units that have assumed responsibility for child find activities and for ensuring a free,
appropriate public education and progress on the implementation of the transition under
this section. During the transition, this report must include the annual report requirements
under section 7006, subsection 5. The joint standing committee of the Legislature having
Page 2 - 132LR2620(01)

414 jurisdiction over education matters may report out a bill related to the report to the session
425 of the Legislature in which the report is received.:
A. Enrollment data for preschool special education students being served in school
administrative units;
B. Expenditure data for preschool special education programming in school
administrative units;
C. Data regarding contracted services provided by Child Development Services
System support and service hubs to school administrative units;
D. Data regarding MaineCare claims paid through the Department of Health and
Human Services for children in preschool special education programming; and
E. Data regarding current and emerging trends and challenges that are influencing or
expected to influence costs, services or service delivery methods.
The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters
may report out a bill related to the report to the session of the Legislature in which the
report is received.
Sec. 7. 20-A MRSA §8803, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 32, §1, is amended
to read:
The department shall report by November 15, 2021 and annually thereafter by March
1st to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education
and cultural affairs on school administrative unit summer educational programs, including
but not limited to summer school and extended school year programs. The report must
include the number of school administrative units administering such programs, the nature
of the programs, the number of participants in the programs, any partnerships with
community-based organizations to provide the programs and the sources of funding for the
programs. The report must also include recommendations, and any suggested legislation,
on improving summer educational programs and identification of any additional funding
needed to ensure the success of summer educational programs.
Sec. 8. 20-A MRSA §10011, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 232, §1, is amended
to read:
3. Report. The department shall report the information compiled under subsection 2,
including national comparisons of retention rates and graduation rates for peer institutions,
annually to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
education and cultural affairs and publish the report on the department's publicly accessible
website.
Sec. 9. 20-A MRSA §13008, as amended by PL 2017, c. 235, §§7 and 8 and affected
by §41, is further amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§13008. Educator workforce preparation program data
Sec. 10. 20-A MRSA §13008, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2017, c. 235, §8 and
affected by §41, is further amended to read:
2. Data collection. The department shall collect data relating to educator preparation
programs and educator credentialing, including but not limited to the following information
with respect to each educator preparation program:
Page 3 - 132LR2620(01)

A. The number of program completers;
A-1. For each educator preparation program, the program's authorization status, time
of next review and added or subtracted approved programs within the past year;
B. The annual number of program completers applicants who pass the teacher
qualifying examinations under section 13032 and the number of those who attain a
conditional, professional or emergency teacher certificate in the State, broken down by
type of certificate;
C. The annual number of program completers educators who proceed from a
conditional or emergency certificate to a professional certificate; and
D. The number of program completers educators who are teaching in schools in this
State 3 and 5 years after they complete that educator preparation program. obtain
conditional, professional or emergency certification; and
E. Workforce shortage data provided to the United States Department of Education.